Utah statutes.
32A-4a-202 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.

(1)  A person seeking a resort license under this chapter shall file a written application with the department, in a form prescribed by the department.  The application shall be accompanied by:

(a)  a nonrefundable $250 application fee;

(b)  an initial license fee, which is refundable if a resort license is not granted, calculated as follows:

(i)  $10,000 if four sublicenses are being applied for under the resort license; or

(ii)  if more than four sublicenses are being applied for under the resort license, the sum of:

(A)  $10,000; and

(B)  $2,000 for each sublicense in excess of four sublicenses for which the applicant is applying;

(c)  written consent of the local authority;

(d)  a copy of:

(i)  the applicant's current business license; and

(ii)  the current business license for each sublicense, if the business license is separate from the applicant's business license;

(e)  evidence:

(i)  of proximity of the resort building to any community location, with proximity requirements being governed by Section 32A-4a-201;

(ii)  that each of the four or more sublicense premises is entirely within the boundaries of the resort building; and

(iii)  that the building designated in the application as the resort building qualifies as a resort building as defined in Section 32A-4a-102;

(f)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-4a-205;

(g)  a description and boundary map of the resort building;

(h)  a description, floor plan, and boundary map of each sublicense premises designating:

(i)  any location at which the resort license applicant proposes that an alcoholic beverage be stored; and

(ii)  a designated location on the sublicense premises from which the resort license applicant proposes that an alcoholic beverage be sold or served and consumed;

(i)  evidence that the resort license applicant carries public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(j)  evidence that the resort license applicant carries dramshop insurance coverage equal to the sum of at least $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate to cover both the general resort license and each sublicense;

(k)  a signed consent form stating that the resort license applicant will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the boundary of the resort building and each sublicense premises;

(l)  if an applicant is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the one or more persons signing the resort license application are authorized to so act on behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and

(m)  any other information the commission or department may require.

(2)  An additional location in a sublicense premises of a resort license applicant's business from which the resort license applicant may propose that an alcoholic beverage may be stored, sold or served, or consumed, not included in the applicant's original application, may be approved by the department upon proper application.

(3) (a)  A resort license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  A resort licensee who wants to renew a resort license shall submit to the department by no later than September 30:

(i)  a renewal fee of $1,000 for each sublicense under the resort license; and

(ii)  a completed renewal application.

(c)  A resort licensee's failure to meet a renewal requirement results in an automatic forfeiture of the resort license and each sublicense effective on the date the existing license expires.

(d)  A renewal application shall be in a form as prescribed by the department.

(4)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-4a-401(14), the commission may suspend or revoke a resort license if the resort licensee fails to immediately notify the department of a change in:

(a)  ownership of the resort licensee;

(b)  for a corporate owner of a resort licensee, the:

(i)  corporate officers or directors; or

(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(c)  for a limited liability company owner or a resort licensee:

(i)  managers; or

(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

